Idaho statutes. Title 10 ISSUES, TRIAL AND JUDGMENT IN CIVIL ACTIONS
Chapter 7
JUDGMENT IN GENERAL

Sec.

§ 10-701. Judgment defined. [Repealed.]

§ 10-702. Judgment as between several parties. [Repealed.]

§ 10-703. Judgment against one of several defendants. [Repealed.]

§ 10-704. Extent of relief. [Repealed.]

§ 10-705. Dismissal or nonsuit. [Repealed.]

§ 10-706. Judgment on merits. [Repealed.]